Arkansas, session 2025, SB123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-79-140(a), concerning the definitions
used for coverage for mammograms and breast ultrasounds, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(11)(A) "Supplemental breast examination" means a medically
necessary and appropriate examination of the breast, according to National
Comprehensive Cancer Network Guidelines, that is:
(i) Used to screen for breast cancer when there is
no abnormality seen or suspected; and
(ii) Based on personal or family medical history or
additional factors that increase the individual's risk of breast cancer,
including heterogeneously or extremely dense breasts.
(B) "Supplemental breast examination" includes without
limitation:
(i) An examination using contrast-enhanced
mammography;
(ii) Breast magnetic resonance imaging;
(iii) Breast ultrasound; or
*ANS166*
02-17-2025 11:19:34 ANS166

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB123
(iv) Molecular breast imaging.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-79-140(e)(3), concerning an insured's
cost-sharing requirements for coverage for diagnostic breast examinations for
breast cancer, is amended to read as follows:
(3) A healthcare insurer shall ensure that an individual's cost-
sharing requirement under a health benefit plan that is applicable to a
provides coverage for diagnostic breast examination for breast cancer,
including breast magnetic resonance imaging, is no less favorable than the
cost-sharing requirement that is applicable to a screening examination for
breast cancer examinations, examinations for breast cancer, and supplemental
breast examinations shall not impose any cost-sharing requirements.

/s/G. Leding






















02-17-2025 11:19:34 ANS166